Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF740.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 2075YH (6) 91 ll/jh H.F. 740 Section 1. Section 562A.9, subsection 3, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 3. Rent shall be payable without demand or notice at the 3 time and place agreed upon by the parties. If a landlord 4 applies a rent increase to the dwelling unit of a current 5 tenant, the percentage increase shall not be greater than three 6 times the percentage increase of the consumer price index for 7 all urban consumers in the midwest region over the previous 8 twelve months or the percentage increase of the property value 9 of the premises as determined by the county assessor for the 10 same time period since the last rent increase, whichever is 11 higher. Unless otherwise agreed, rent is payable at the 12 dwelling unit and periodic rent is payable at the beginning of 13 any term of one month or less and otherwise in equal monthly 14 installments at the beginning of each month. Unless otherwise 15 agreed, rent shall be uniformly apportionable from day-to-day. 16 Sec. 2. Section 562B.14, subsection 7, Code 2025, is amended 17 to read as follows: 18 7. If a landlord applies a rent increase to the mobile home 19 space of a current tenant, the percentage increase shall not 20 be greater than three times the percentage increase of the 21 consumer price index for all urban consumers in the midwest 22 region over the previous twelve months or the percentage 23 increase of the property value of the manufactured home 24 community or the mobile home park as determined by the county 25 assessor for the same time period since the last rent increase, 26 whichever is higher. Each tenant shall be notified, in 27 writing, of any rent increase at least ninety days before the 28 effective date. Such effective date shall not be sooner than 29 the expiration date of the original rental agreement or any 30 renewal or extension thereof. 31